Utah statutes.
76-9-906.   Protection of constitutional rights.
(1)  This section does not affect or limit any individual's constitutional
right to engage in collective advocacy activities that are protected by the
constitution or laws of this state or by the constitution or laws of the
United States.
(2)  The sheriff or chief of police shall issue a written directive to all
agency employees that provides information on preventing the enforcement of
Section 76-9-903 against persons who are engaged in constitutionally protected
collective advocacy activities.
